src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexd
LEXICON Independent_Prefix
laa'<Indep>:laa'

LEXICON Pronouns
a'in # this
a'wanle' # that on (over there)
la # you singular
maajun # noone
maak'a' # nothing
maa'ani # no one
qe # ours
yu'yu # something
junaq # some
chixjunil # everything

PATTERN Independent_Pronouns
Independent_Prefix :Set_B Set_B:
[a'an<Indep><Sg3>:a'an\<]
[a'an<Indep><Pl3>:a'an\<] :Pluralizer

PATTERN Complete_Pronouns
Pronouns [<Pro>:]
[a'in<Pro>:a'in] Pluralizer
[chixjunil<Pro>:chixjunil] Pluralizer
